Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2156.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2816. Municipal consortium power purchasing.(a) Municipal authority to aggregate.--A municipality may establish a municipal consortium power purchasing program to aggregate the electric load of residential customers within the jurisdiction of the municipality who voluntarily opt in, in accordance with the following:(1) The municipality shall act as an aggregator under the authority of 8 Pa.C.S. § 24A01 (relating to definitions) and this section without requiring a license as an electric generation supplier under 52 Pa. Code § 54.32 (relating to application process).12345678910111213141516171819 (2) The program shall be limited to residential customers within the same electric distribution company territory to ensure uniform rate applicability.(3) The municipality shall negotiate with one or more electric generation suppliers to procure a rate below the default rate for participants. If no rate below the default rate is secured, participants shall be enrolled in the default rate of the electric distribution company.(4) With written authorization from the governing body of an adjacent or contiguous municipality, a municipality may extend the program to residential customers within that municipality's jurisdiction, provided that all residential customers remain within the same electric distribution company territory.(b) Opt-in requirement and consumer protections.--Participation in the program shall be voluntary, requiring affirmative opt-in by each residential customer through a process established by the municipality, including written or electronic consent. A municipality implementing a municipal consortium power purchasing program shall:(1) Provide clear disclosure of program terms, including the potential for no savings, the default rate fallback and the right to opt out at any time without penalty, consistent with 52 Pa. Code § 54.5 (relating to disclosure statement for residential and small business customers).(2) Comply with 52 Pa. Code § 54.4 (relating to bill format for residential and small business customers).(3) Comply with 52 Pa. Code § 54.7 (relating to marketing/sales activities).(4) Protect residential customer information under 52 20260HB2156PN2790 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pa. Code § 54.8 (relating to privacy of customer information).(5) For programs involving renewable energy sources, comply with the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act, as applicable under section 2814 (relating to additional alternative energy sources).(6) Establish an annual enrollment period in accordance with the following:(i) Residents shall indicate intent to participate no later than September 15 each year. The indication shall include the resident's average monthly kilowatt-hours usage from the prior 12 months, as shown on the electric distribution company bill.(ii) On or before October 20, the municipality shall notify all residents who indicated intent under subparagraph (i) the secured rate and term.(iii) Residents must affirmatively elect to participate by October 30. Election to participate shall be binding for the 12-month period beginning with the first billing cycle in November.(iv) Once elected, a participant may not opt out before the end of the 12-month period except in cases of relocation outside the electric distribution company territory or extenuating circumstances approved by the municipality.(c) No-cost participation and administrative fee.--(1) The municipal consortium power purchasing program shall be offered at no cost to residential customers, including no enrollment or participation fees.20260HB2156PN2790 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A municipality may collect an administrative fee not exceeding 1% of the total savings achieved by participants, calculated as the difference between the default rate and the procured rate multiplied by the total kilowatt-hours consumed by participants. The fee shall be disclosed to participants prior to enrollment and reported to the commission annually.(3) The administrative fee under paragraph (2) shall be collected by the electric generation supplier and remitted monthly to the municipality, itemized on residential customer's bills as "municipal administrative fee."(4) If no savings are achieved, no administrative fee shall be collected.(d) Program implementation.--The municipality shall:(1) Issue a competitive request for proposals to electric generation suppliers to procure a rate for the aggregated load, ensuring transparency and compliance with municipal procurement laws.(2) Coordinate with the electric distribution company to enroll participants in the selected electric generation supplier's rate or the default rate, as applicable, consistent with 52 Pa. Code § 54.1 (relating to purpose).(3) Establish a resident advisory committee to provide input on program design, supplier selection and performance evaluation.(4) Register the program and disclose the secured rate on the PA Power Switch platform within 10 days of electric generation supplier selection.(5) Ensure all program participant billing, payment and residential customer service functions remain within the electric distribution company. The electric generation 20260HB2156PN2790 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 supplier shall provide generation charges to the electrical distribution company for inclusion on the consolidated bill in accordance with 52 Pa. Code § 54.4 (relating to bill format for residential and small business customers).(e) Reporting requirements.--A municipality operating a consortium power purchasing program shall submit an annual report to the commission's Bureau of Conservation, Economics and Energy Planning under 52 Pa. Code § 54.203 (relating to reporting requirements), including:(1) The total energy procured in kilowatt-hours.(2) The procured rate compared to the default rate.(3) Total savings achieved, if any, and any administrative fee collected.(4) The number of residential customer accounts enrolled.(5) A summary of resident feedback and complaints, with resolutions.(6) The number of program participants who attempted to opt out prior to the end of the 12-month period and the disposition of each request.(f) Enforcement and audits.--(1) The commission shall enforce this section under section 501 (relating to general powers) and 52 Pa. Code § 54.43 (relating to standards of conduct and disclosure for licensees).(2) A violation of this section may result in a fine or other penalty under section 3301 (relating to civil penalties for violations).(3) The commission may audit a municipality's compliance with this section, consistent with section 1307(d) (relating 20260HB2156PN2790 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to sliding scale of rates; adjustments).(g) Scope.--This section shall apply to municipal consortium power purchasing programs established on or after the effective date of this section.(h) Regulations.--The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission shall promulgate regulations to implement this section.(i) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Default rate." The price to compare rate established by an electric distribution company under section 2807 (relating to duties of electric distribution companies) and 52 Pa. Code § 54.182 (relating to definitions)."Electric distribution company." As defined in section 2803 (relating to definitions)."Electric generation supplier." An entity licensed under 52 Pa. Code § 54.32 (relating to application process) to provide electric generation service."Municipal consortium power purchasing program" or "program." A program established by a municipality to aggregate the electric load of residential customers who voluntarily opt in for the purpose of procuring electric generation service at a rate below the default rate."Municipality." A borough, township, city or county as defined in 8 Pa.C.S. § 101.1 (relating to definitions)."PA Power Switch platform." The online platform maintained by the commission, known as www.PaPowerSwitch.com or its successor, for comparing and selecting electric generation suppliers, as referenced in 52 Pa. Code § 54.5(e)(13) (relating to disclosure statement for residential and small business 20260HB2156PN2790 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 customers)."Residential customer." A customer purchasing electric generation service for residential use, as defined in 52 Pa. Code § 54.2 (relating to definitions).Section 2. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20260HB2156PN2790 - 7 - 1234567